Utah statutes.
72-12-109.   Wage and hour regulations unaffected by ride-sharing.

The fact that an employee participates in any kind of ride-sharing arrangement does not affect the application of any laws requiring payment of a minimum wage or overtime pay or otherwise regulating the hours a person may work.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

